Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [160.805] CERTAIN HIGHWAY DESIGNATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Sign requirements; costs. new text end new text begin (a) A road authority must design and erect signs to mark or memorialize a highway or bridge that is under the road authority's jurisdiction and designated under this section. The requirement under this paragraph applies once the road authority identifies money from nonpublic sources sufficient to pay all costs related to designing, erecting, and maintaining the signs. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must act as a fiscal agent to provide for management and distribution of nonpublic money received under this section. The money collected is appropriated to the commissioner for distribution to the appropriate road authority for costs related to designing, erecting, and maintaining the signs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sign requirements; removal. new text end new text begin A road authority may remove a sign erected under this section if: new text end new text begin (1) the sign requires maintenance, repair, or replacement; new text end new text begin (2) the road authority, in consultation with the commissioner, has made a reasonable effort to obtain money for maintenance, repair, or replacement from nonpublic sources; and new text end new text begin (3) the money obtained under clause (2) is insufficient to pay all related costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Master Sergeant Nicole Amor Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin That segment of Ramsey County State-Aid Highway 96 from marked U.S. Highway 61 to marked Interstate Highway 35E in Ramsey County is designated as "Master Sergeant Nicole Amor Memorial Highway." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end